Alaska, session 34, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 11.61.200(h)(1) is amended to read: 04 (1) "prohibited weapon" means any 05 (A) explosive, incendiary, or noxious gas 06 (i) mine or device that is designed, made, or adapted for 07 the purpose of inflicting serious physical injury or death; 08 (ii) rocket, other than an emergency flare, having a 09 propellant charge of more than four ounces; 10 (iii) bomb; or 11 (iv) grenade; 12 (B) device designed, made, or adapted to muffle the report of a 13 firearm; 14 (C) firearm that is capable of shooting more than one shot 15 automatically, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger; 01 [OR] 02 (D) rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches, shotgun 03 with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, or firearm made from a rifle or 04 shotgun which, as modified, has an overall length of less than 26 inches; or 05 (E) device designed, made, or adapted to convert a handgun 06 into a firearm that is capable of shooting more than one shot 07 automatically, without manual reloading, by a single function of the 08 trigger; 09 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 10 read: 11 APPLICABILITY. AS 11.61.200(h)(1), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to 12 offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.